Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5807.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 476a. (1) Beginning August 3, 1987, whenever, by a law in force outside of this state or country, a domestic insurer or agent of a domestic insurer is required to make a deposit of securities for the protection of policyholders or otherwise, or to make payment for taxes, fines, penalties, certificates of authority, valuation of policies, or otherwise, or a special burden or other burden is imposed, greater in the aggregate, after the subtraction described in subsection (8), than is required by the laws of this state for a similar alien or foreign insurer or agent of an alien or foreign insurer, the alien or foreign insurer of that state or country is required, as a condition precedent to its transacting business in this state, to make a like deposit for like purposes with the state treasurer of this state, and to pay to the revenue commissioner for taxes, fines, penalties, certificates of authority, valuation of policies, and otherwise an amount equal in the aggregate to the charges and payments imposed by the laws of the other state or country upon a similar domestic insurer and the agents of a domestic insurer, reduced by the subtraction described in subsection (8), regardless of whether a domestic insurer or agent of a domestic insurer is actually transacting business in that state or country. For fire department or salvage corps taxes or other local taxes the amount shall be computed by the revenue commissioner by dividing the total of the payments made by domestic insurers in that state or country by the gross premium received by domestic insurers in that state or country less return premiums. The commissioner shall revoke the certificate of authority of an alien or foreign insurer refusing for 30 days to make payment of fees or taxes as required by this chapter. Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4), for purposes of this section, an insurer organized under the laws of a state or country other than these United States shall be considered an insurer of the state in which its general deposit for the benefit of its policyholders is made. (2) The purpose of this section is to promote the interstate business of domestic insurers by deterring other states from enacting discriminatory or excessive taxes. (3) Subsection (4) does not apply to a domestic insurer that is owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by an alien or foreign insurer who prior to 1998 and with the commissionerâs approval did not keep books, records, and files or true copies thereof in this state. (4) For purposes of this section, the state treasurer, after consultation with the commissioner, shall determine that a domestic insurer is an alien or foreign insurer domiciled in a state or country determined by the state treasurer if the insurer does not comply with all of the following: (a) Maintain its principal place of business in this state. (b) Maintain in this state officers and personnel responsible for and knowledgeable of the companyâs operation, books, records, administration, and annual statement. (c) Conduct in this state a substantial portion of its underwriting, sales, claims, legal, and, if applicable, medical operations relating to Michigan policyholders and certificate holders. (d) Comply with section 5256(1)(a) and (2) to (6). The commissioner shall inform the state treasurer when a domestic insurer is not in compliance with section 5256(1)(a) or (2) to (6). (5) Taxes collected under this section are subject to section 243 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1243, or section 643 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.643. (6) The state treasurer shall administer the tax prescribed by this section in the manner provided in 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31. (7) The requirements of section 28 of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.28, that prohibit an employee or an authorized representative or former employee or authorized representative or anyone connected with the department of treasury from divulging any facts or information obtained in connection with the administration of taxes, do not apply to disclosure of the tax return prescribed in this act. (8) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2027, in calculating the total burdens imposed by a foreign state or country on a domestic insurer or agent under subsection (1), including any required deposits, payments, or other burdens described in that subsection, an alien or foreign insurer that is a qualified taxpayer may subtract a housing opportunity tax credit for a qualified project in an amount equal to the amount of that credit listed on the allocation report for that qualified taxpayer for that qualified project, and the subtraction shall constitute the housing opportunity tax credit. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9), an alien or foreign insurer that is a qualified taxpayer and an owner shall claim a subtraction for a housing opportunity tax credit listed on an allocation report for the ownerâs tax year described in section 22e(5) of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422e. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9), an alien or foreign insurer that is a qualified taxpayer that has been allocated a housing opportunity tax credit listed on an allocation report shall claim a subtraction for that credit for the qualified taxpayerâs tax year described in section 22e(6) of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422e. An alien or foreign insurer shall not claim a subtraction for a housing opportunity tax credit for a calendar year listed on an allocation report unless the alien or foreign insurer and the amount of the alien or foreign insurerâs credit are listed on that allocation report. (9) To claim the subtraction under subsection (8), an alien or foreign insurer that is a qualified taxpayer shall attach a copy of the eligibility statement to the annual tax return filed under this act on which the subtraction is claimed. However, if the owner of the qualified project that has received an approval notice has submitted a final cost certification and a request for an eligibility statement to the authority but the authority has not yet approved the final cost certification and issued the eligibility statement to the owner, the alien or foreign insurer that is a qualified taxpayer may either claim the subtraction on the qualified taxpayerâs annual return for the tax year as prescribed under subsection (8) by attaching a copy of the approval notice for that qualified project or wait to claim the subtraction on the qualified taxpayerâs annual return for the tax year in which the eligibility statement for the qualified project is issued. If an updated allocation report is provided to the department under section 22e(8)(b) of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422e, that reduces or increases the amount of a housing opportunity tax credit that was previously claimed as a subtraction under this section by an alien or foreign insurer that is a qualified taxpayer, each alien or foreign insurer that is a qualified taxpayer that had its credit amount adjusted shall file an amended return for the affected tax year to adjust the amount of the credit accordingly. (10) If any portion of a federal low-income housing tax credit claimed for a qualified project for which an alien or foreign insurer also claimed a subtraction under subsection (8) or a credit under section 678 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.678, is required to be recaptured or is otherwise disallowed during the credit period under section 42 of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 42, the alien or foreign insurer that claimed the subtraction under subsection (8) or the credit under section 678 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.678, for that same qualified project is also required to recapture a portion of the housing opportunity tax credit as provided under this subsection. The percentage of the housing opportunity tax credit subject to recapture must be equal to the percentage of the federal low-income housing tax credit subject to recapture or otherwise disallowed during the same tax year. For an alien or foreign insurer that is a qualified taxpayer that, without regard to the amount of any recapture that may be required under this subsection, is subject to the tax under this section for the tax year in which the recapture or disallowance event is identified on the federal return, any housing opportunity tax credits recaptured or disallowed must be added back to the tax liability of the qualified taxpayer in a like amount and must be included on the annual return of the qualified taxpayer submitted for the tax year in which the recapture or disallowance event is identified on the federal return. (11) As used in this section: (a) âAllocation reportâ, âapproval noticeâ, âeligibility statementâ, âfederal low-income housing tax creditâ, âflow-through entityâ, âhousing opportunity tax creditâ, âownerâ, and âqualified projectâ mean those terms as defined under section 22e of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1422e. (b) âAuthorityâ means the Michigan state housing development authority created under section 21 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1421. (c) âQualified taxpayerâ means any of the following: (i) The owner of a qualified project that has received an eligibility statement for that qualified project. (ii) The owner of a qualified project that received an approval notice and has submitted a final cost certification and a request for an eligibility statement to the authority but the authority has not yet approved the final cost certification and issued the eligibility statement to the owner. (iii) An alien or foreign insurer that owns a direct or indirect, through 1 or more other flow-through entities, interest in an owner described under subparagraph (i) or (ii) and that has been allocated a housing opportunity tax credit at any time prior to filing an annual or amended return under this act on which a subtraction under subsection (8) is claimed. Sec. 476b. Authorized insurers are subject to the tax as provided in section 476a if applicable or the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1519, or part 2 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.601 to 206.699, whichever is greater. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 966. (b) House Bill No. 5806. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor